Idaho, session 2026, H0636.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-911, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-911. SCHOOL DISTRICT FACILITIES FUND. (1) There is hereby cre-
ated in the state treasury the school district facilities fund. The fund
shall consist of moneys provided pursuant to sections 57-811, 63-3638, and
67-7434, Idaho Code, and any legislative transfers or appropriations. In-
terest earned from the investment of moneys in the fund shall be returned to
the fund. Moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated for the
purposes stated in this section.
(2) The moneys in the fund shall be distributed by the state controller
to the state department of education by August 1 each year for the purpose of
construction or renovation of school facilities. The moneys shall be dis-
tributed by the state department of education to each school district, as
defined in section 33-1001(21), Idaho Code, first as provided in subsection
(7) of this section and then on a per-pupil basis using the average daily at-
tendance calculation provided in section 33-1003A, Idaho Code, for each stu-
dent in kindergarten through grade 12 at physical facilities that are part
of and on school grounds of the school district in which the student is en-
rolled with verification, as needed, by the office of the state board of edu-
cation. Upon formal approval by the state board of education, a school dis-
trict may receive an exemption to the physical facility requirement pursuant
to this subsection if the student would have attended a physical facility in
the school district if not for a stated emergency. The state department of
education shall transfer the moneys by no later than August 31 each year to
each school district. Such moneys shall be used in place of property tax levy
moneys and shall be expended by a school district for one (1) or more of the
purposes set forth in paragraphs (a) through (f) of this subsection. Moneys
in the fund must be used by a school district in the following order of prior-
ity:
(a) Payment of existing school bonds authorized pursuant to chapter 11,
title 33, Idaho Code, and issued prior to July 1, 2025;
(b) Payments required pursuant to section 33-909, Idaho Code;
(c) Payment of existing school bonds authorized pursuant to chapter 11,
title 33, Idaho Code, and issued on or after July 1, 2025;
(d) Payment of supplemental school levies authorized pursuant to sec-
tion 33-802, Idaho Code, excluding indefinite term supplemental levies
described in section 33-802(5), Idaho Code;


(e) Payment of school plant facility levies authorized pursuant to sec-
tions 33-804 and 33-804A, Idaho Code; and
(f) Any moneys that remain following the payments provided in para-
graphs (a) through (e) of this subsection may be: used for construction
of a new school facility, renovation, or maintenance needs; used to
secure and make payments on a new school facilities bond; used to make
additional payments on existing school facilities bonds; used to make
payments on lease-purchase agreements for school facilities; or saved
in a reserve account by the school district for future school facil-
ity needs. Uses of funds shall include regular and routine facilities
maintenance, including preventive maintenance, building repairs, and
building security, and periodic major facilities projects that involve
planning, design, construction, renovation, retrofitting, and replac-
ing of buildings and building systems, components, and features, as
well as site acquisition, site improvements, and new construction.
(3) The amount of moneys received by a school district pursuant to this
section subsection (2)(a), (c), (d), and (e) of this section must be deducted
from a school levy that would otherwise have been paid by property taxpayers.
Such moneys may not be duplicated by the collection of property tax, and no
property taxes may be collected in order to make extra payments on expenses
described in subsection (2) of this section in excess of required amounts.
(4) Each school district shall identify the amount received in the cur-
rent year pursuant to this section in the certification of its budget in ac-
cordance with section 63-803, Idaho Code. Said amount must be subtracted
from the amount to be levied. The amount of moneys thereby saved from being
collected by a property tax levy shall be reported on each property tax no-
tice pursuant to section 63-902, Idaho Code.
(5) Each school district shall report annually to the state department
of education, in a manner prescribed by it, on the expenditure of moneys it
has received pursuant to this section. The state department of education
shall present the reports to the legislature each January.
(6) For the purposes of this section, the Idaho school for the deaf and
the blind shall be considered a school district and shall receive a distribu-
tion based on the average daily attendance of the school.
(7)(a) For state fiscal year 2025 only, any school district that would
have received support from the bond levy equalization support program
for a qualified bond passed prior to January 1, 2024, and for which prop-
erty taxes were levied in property tax year 2023 pursuant to the amount
intended by the bond shall receive a distribution of funds from the dis-
tribution provided under subsection (2) of this section of at least as
much as would have been provided through bond levy equalization support
on July 1, 2024.
(b) For state fiscal year 2026 only, any school district that would have
received support from the bond levy equalization support program for a
qualified bond passed prior to January 1, 2024, and for which property
taxes were levied in property tax year 2024 pursuant to the amount in-
tended by the bond shall receive a distribution of funds from the dis-
tribution provided under subsection (2) of this section of at least as
much as would have been provided through bond levy equalization support
on July 1, 2025.


(c) The state department of education may adjust distributions for re-
maining districts proportionally as necessary pursuant to this para-
graph. On and after July 1, 2024, school districts may use funds pro-
vided in this section and section 33-913, Idaho Code, to offset the bond
levy equalization support.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.